Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB574.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "hazardous substance" in section 103 of the act of October 18, 1988 (P.L.756, No.108), known as the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Hazardous substance."(1) Any element, compound or material which is:(i) Designated as a hazardous waste under the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, and the regulations promulgated thereto.(ii) Defined or designated as a hazardous substance pursuant to the Federal Superfund Act.(iii) Contaminated with a hazardous substance to the degree that its release or threatened release poses a substantial threat to the public health and safety or the environment as determined by the department.(iv) Determined to be substantially harmful to public health and safety or the environment based on a standardized and uniformly applied department testing procedure and listed in regulations proposed by the department and promulgated by the Environmental Quality Board.(v) A polyfluoroalkyl or perfluorinated substance, including, but not limited to, perfluorooctane sulfonate, perfluorooctanoic acid, perfluorononanoic acid and perfluorohexane sulfonic acid.(1.1) A chemical substance not included under paragraph (1) that:(i) the department determines to be the equivalent of a compound under paragraph (1) in accordance with section 301(16.1); or(ii) is designated by executive order of the 20250HB0574PN0578 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Governor as a chemical substance or chemical compound that poses a threat to public health and safety or the environment.(2) The term does not include petroleum or petroleum products, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, which are not otherwise specifically listed or designated as a hazardous substance under paragraph (1); natural gas, natural gas liquids, liquified natural gas or synthetic gas usable for fuel or mixtures of natural gas and synthetic gas usable for fuel; or an element, substance, compound or mixture from a coal mining operation under the jurisdiction of the department or from a site eligible for funding under Title IV of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (Public Law 95-87, 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.). The term shall also not include the following wastes generated primarily from the combustion of coal or other fossil fuels for the production of electricity: slag waste; flue gas emission control waste; and fly ash waste and bottom ash waste which is disposed of or beneficially used in accordance with the Solid Waste Management Act and the regulations promulgated thereto or which has been disposed of under a valid permit issued pursuant to any other environmental statute.* * *"Public water supplier." The term shall have the meaning given to "supplier of water" in section 3 of the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act.* * *"Special drinking water resource-impacted community." A municipality whose surface or groundwater resources used for 20250HB0574PN0578 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public drinking water supply purposes have been impaired by emerging contaminants, methane or other gases or catastrophic releases of pollutants to the water resources for which treatment or alternative water supply development or procurement is required on an emergency basis to protect public health and safety.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 105. Disaster emergency declaration.(a) Authority.--The Governor shall have the authority in accordance with 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to general authority of Governor) to declare a municipality a special drinking water resource-impacted community based on the finding of one or more of the following:(1) The discovery of a release or threatened release of hazardous substances.(2) Polyfluoroalkyl or perfluorinated substances, including, but not limited to, perfluorooctane sulfonate, perfluorooctanoic acid, perfluorononanoic acid and perfluorohexane sulfonic acid, if one of them is present in groundwater or surface water individually measured across a 12-month simple rolling average above 10 parts per trillion.(3) Other pollutants in the municipality's public water supply system.(b) Special drinking water resource-impacted communities.--The Governor may establish alternative or incident-specific drinking water standards and cleanup standards for impaired surface or groundwater resources in a special drinking water resource-impacted community. Standards established under this section shall take effect immediately upon establishment by the 20250HB0574PN0578 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Governor and remain in effect:(1) for 24 months;(2) until the Governor has rescinded or amended the standard;(3) until the emergency condition and public health threat has been abated; or(4) with respect to drinking water resources, until either a final rulemaking is published by the Environmental Quality Board establishing a maximum contaminant level for the substance under the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, or a final rulemaking is published by the Environmental Protection Agency establishing a maximum contaminant level.(c) Grants.--A special drinking water resource-impacted community shall be eligible to receive a PENNVEST grant under the act of March 1, 1988 (P.L.82, No.16), known as the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority Act, of up to $1,000,000 per impacted water supply source. The grants may be used to provide treatment to impacted public water supplies, extension of water lines, booster stations, pressure management equipment, interconnection of private water users to public water supply systems and analytical sampling and to procure alternative water supply resources.Section 106. Testing requirement, duty to report and public access.(a) Testing.--A municipality has the authority, by ordinance, to require a public water supplier to test for polyfluoroalkyl or perfluorinated substances within the municipal water supply.(b) Duty to report.--A public water supplier that meets 20250HB0574PN0578 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 either of the following criteria shall report to the department both monthly averages and 12-month simple rolling averages of each polyfluoroalkyl or perfluorinated substance found within the public water supplier's water supply:(1) The public water supplier serves a municipality that has been declared a special drinking water resource-impacted community under section 105.(2) The public water supplier is required by municipal ordinance to test for polyfluoroalkyl or perfluorinated substances within the municipal water supply.(c) Public information.--The department shall make the information reported under subsection (b) available to the public and post the information on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 3. Sections 301 and 701(b) of the act are amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 301. Powers and duties of department.The department has the following powers and duties:* * *(16.1) Within 12 months of the establishment of a maximum contaminant level, health advisory level or provisional health advisory level under the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, or a similar Federal law for any chemical substance or chemical compound not included in the definition of "hazardous substance," determine whether the chemical compound or chemical substance should be designated by regulation as a hazardous substance.* * *Section 701. Responsible person.20250HB0574PN0578 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(b) Exceptions.--* * *(6) No municipality, municipal authority or other public water supplier shall be considered a responsible person under this act due to the presence of a polyfluoroalkyl substance or perfluorinated chemical in wastewater treatment plant sludge, water supply treatment residuals, spent filter media or similar facility operational, wastes where the presence of the polyfluoroalkyl substance or perfluorinated chemical is due to chemical characteristics of the entity's water supply source or discharges into the wastewater treatment facility.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0574PN0578 - 7 - 1234567891011121314